Hawaii, session 2025, SB1175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 103D-329, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§103D-329[]]  Past performance database.  (a) No later than December 31, 2023, the state procurement office shall implement and administer a past performance database with regard to state contractors. (b)  The state procurement office shall adopt rules no later than December 31, 2023, pursuant to chapter 91 to establish: (1)  Information required to be included in the past performance database; provided that the information shall include: (A)  The name of the state contractor; (B)  The date of the project; (C)  The size of the project; (D)  A brief description of the project; (E)  The responsible managing employees for the project; (F)  Whether or not the project was timely completed; (G)  The project's authorized budget; [and] (H)  The positive or negative difference between the final cost of the project and the project's authorized budget, including the reasons for the difference, if any; and (I)  The state contractor's project performance assessment, determined by the state procurement office, including information on the following for goods, services, and construction, as applicable: (i)  Quality of work; (ii)  Schedule and timeliness of performance; (iii)  Cost and financial management; (iv)  Management, personnel, and labor; (v)  Safety and security; and (vi)  General comments. (2)  Procedures to inform a contractor of the information contained in the past performance database about that contractor; and (3)  Procedures for a contractor to correct or respond to the information contained in the past performance database about that contractor." SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for all anticipated activities, including revising the past performance database, for the purposes of this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the state procurement office for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the annual maintenance of the past performance database. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the state procurement office for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect January 1, 2491.